Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1052.
do enact as follows:SB1052,13Section 1. 119.04 (1) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Acts 42 4and 79, is amended to read:SB1052,2,105119.04 (1) Subchapters IV, V and VII of ch. 115, ch. 121 and ss. 66.0235 (3) (c), 666.0603 (1m) to (3), 115.01 (1) and (2), 115.28, 115.31, 115.33, 115.34, 115.343, 7115.345, 115.363, 115.364, 115.365 (3), 115.366, 115.367, 115.38 (2), 115.415, 1115.445, 118.001 to 118.04, 118.045, 118.06 to 118.076, 118.10, 118.12, 118.124, 2118.125 to 118.14, 118.145 (4), 118.15, 118.153, 118.16, 118.162, 118.163, 118.164, 3118.18, 118.19, 118.196, 118.20, 118.223, 118.225, 118.24 (1), (2) (c) to (f), (6), (8), 4and (10), 118.245, 118.25, 118.255, 118.291, 118.292, 118.293, 118.2935, 118.30 to 5118.43, 118.46, 118.50, 118.51, 118.52, 118.53, 118.55, 118.56, 118.58, 120.12 (2m), 6(4m), (5), (15) to (27), and (29), and (30), 120.125, 120.13 (1), (2) (b) to (g), (3), (14), 7(17) to (19), (26), (34), (35), (37), (37m), and (38), 120.137, 120.14, 120.20, 120.21 (3), 8and 120.25 are applicable to a 1st class city school district and board but not, unless 9explicitly provided in this chapter or in the terms of a contract, to the commissioner 10or to any school transferred to an opportunity schools and partnership program.SB1052,211Section 2. 120.12 (30) of the statutes is created to read:SB1052,2,1412120.12 (30) Teacher preparation time. Ensure that each teacher’s daily 13schedule includes self-directed preparation time of at least 45 minutes or the 14equivalent of one class period, whichever is greater.SB1052,315Section 3. Initial applicability.SB1052,2,1916(1) This act first applies to a teacher who is affected by a collective bargaining 17agreement or other contract that contains provisions inconsistent with this act on 18the day on which the collective bargaining agreement or contract expires or is 19extended, modified, or renewed, whichever occurs first.SB1052,2,2020